Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-822
Nuisance; action to abate; punished as for contempt; when.

Whenever a nuisance exists as provided for in sections 28-807 to 28-829, any city, village, or county, through its chief law enforcement officer, may bring an action in equity to abate such a nuisance and to perpetually enjoin the person maintaining the same from further maintenance thereof. If any person continues to use the building or place for such purpose he shall be punished as for contempt.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 178.